Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2007
Applicant; initial assessment.

An applicant for community college gap assistance under the community college gap assistance program shall complete an initial assessment administered by the community college or other eligible institution receiving the application to determine the applicant's readiness to complete an eligible program. The initial assessment shall include any assessments required by the eligible program.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 33;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 61.